California, session 20252026, AB995.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 15006.5 is added to the Government Code, to read:15006.5. (a) On or before January 1, 2027, the Department of Justice shall establish on its internet website a database of known phone scams for the purpose of empowering consumers, assisting law enforcement in monitoring emerging threats, and reducing the prevalence of phone scams. The department shall verify reports of suspected phone scams and update the database on a monthly basis. The(b) The internet website shall also include all of the following:(a)A list of known scam phone numbers.(1) Current details about the most frequently reported known scams. (b)(2) A description of common tactics used by scammers.(c)(3) Guidance on identifying and avoiding fraudulent communications.(d)(4) A mechanism to report suspected scams to allow the department to update the database.(5) A search tool that enables the public to search for known phone scams based on key terms of the source of the scam.(c) (1) On or before January 1, 2028, and each January 1 thereafter, the department shall submit to the Legislature a report detailing the number of reported and known phone scams, as well as the most common types of scams during the prior calendar year.(2) A report to be submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795.(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2033, and as of that date is repealed.